Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2105.   Participation of a public entity or a procurement unit in agreements or contracts of procurement units -- Cooperative purchasing -- State cooperative contracts.

(1)  The chief procurement officer may, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, enter into a cooperative procurement, and a contract that is awarded as a result of a cooperative procurement, with:

(a)  another state;

(b)  an external procurement unit; or

(c)  a public entity in Utah or outside of Utah.

(2)  A public entity may obtain a procurement item from a state cooperative contract or a contract awarded by the chief procurement officer under Subsection (1), without signing a participating addendum if the quote, invitation for bids, or request for proposals used to obtain the contract includes a statement indicating that the resulting contract will be issued on behalf of a public entity in Utah.

(3)  Except as provided in Section 63G-6a-408, or as otherwise provided in this chapter, an executive branch procurement unit may not obtain a procurement item from a source other than a state cooperative contract or a contract awarded by the chief procurement officer under Subsection (1), if the procurement item is available under a state cooperative contract or a contract awarded by the chief procurement officer under Subsection (1).

(4)  A Utah procurement unit may:

(a)  contract with the federal government without going through a standard procurement process or an exception to a standard procurement process, described in Part 8, Exceptions to Procurement Requirements, if the procurement item obtained under the contract is provided:

(i)  directly by the federal government and not by a person contracting with the federal government; or

(ii)  by a person under contract with the federal government that obtained the contract in a manner that substantially complies with the provisions of this chapter;

(b)  participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative procurement with another Utah procurement unit or another public entity in Utah, if:

(i)  each party unit involved in the cooperative procurement enters into an agreement describing the rights and duties of each party;

(ii)  the procurement is conducted, and the contract awarded, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter;

(iii)  the request for quotes, the invitation for bids, or the request for proposals:

(A)  clearly indicates that the procurement is a cooperative procurement; and

(B)  identifies each party that may purchase under the resulting contract; and

(iv)  each party involved in the cooperative procurement signs a participating addendum describing its rights and obligations in relation to the resulting contract; or

(c)  purchase under, or otherwise participate in, an agreement or contract of an external procurement unit, if:

(i)  each party involved in the cooperative procurement enters into an agreement describing the rights and duties of each party;

(ii)  the procurement was conducted in accordance with the requirements of this chapter; 

(iii)  the request for quotes, the invitation for bids, or the request for proposals:

(A)  clearly indicates that the procurement is a cooperative procurement; and

(B)  identifies each party that may purchase under the resulting contract; and

(iv)  each party involved in the cooperative procurement signs a participating addendum describing its rights and obligations in relation to the resulting contract.

(5)  A procurement unit may not obtain a procurement item under a contract that results from a cooperative procurement described in Subsection (4), if the procurement unit:

(a)  is not identified under Subsection (4)(b)(iii)(B) or (4)(c)(iii)(B); or

(b)  does not sign a participating addendum to the contract as required by this section.

(6)  A procurement unit, other than a legislative procurement unit or a judicial procurement unit, may not obtain a procurement item under a contract held by the United States General Services Administration, unless, based upon documentation provided by the procurement unit, the Director of the State Division of Purchasing and General Services determines in writing that the United States General Services Administration procured the contract in a manner that substantially complies with the provisions of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

